pl: Rozmiar gwintu listwy: Rozmiar #11 (japoński); Rozmiar #12 (japoński); Rozmiar #16 (japoński); Rozmiar #4 (japoński); Rozmiar #8 (japoński); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Cienki; G; Gruby; Średni; Inne
fi: Helmiketjun koko: #11 (japanilainen koko); #12 (japanilainen koko); #16 (japanilainen koko); #4 (japanilainen koko); #8 (japanilainen koko); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Ohut; G; Paksu; Keskipaksu; Muu
pt-PT: Tamanho do fio para trabalhos com miçangas: #11 (tamanho japonês); #12 (tamanho japonês); #16 (tamanho japonês); #4 (tamanho japonês); #8 (tamanho japonês); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fino; G; Grosso; Médio; Outro
hu: Gyöngyfűző cérna mérete: #11 (japán méret); #12 (japán méret); #16 (japán méret); #4 (japán méret); #8 (japán méret); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Finom; G; Vastag; Közepes; Egyéb
cs: Tloušťka korálkovací nitě: #11 (japonská velikost); #12 (japonská velikost); #16 (japonská velikost); #4 (japonská velikost); #8 (japonská velikost); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Jemná; G; Silná; Střední; Jiné
ko: 비즈 공예용 실 굵기: #11(일본 사이즈); #12(일본 사이즈); #16(일본 사이즈); #4(일본 사이즈); #8(일본 사이즈); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; 파인; G; 헤비; 미디엄; 기타
zh-CN: 串珠线尺寸: 11 号（日本尺寸）; 12 号（日本尺寸）; 16 号（日本尺寸）; 4 号（日本尺寸）; 8 号（日本尺寸）; 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; 细; G; 粗; 中; 其他
da: Perletrådsstørrelse: #11 (japansk størrelse); #12 (japansk størrelse); #16 (japansk størrelse); #4 (japansk størrelse); #8 (japansk størrelse); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fin; G; Kraftig; Medium; Anden
pt-BR: Tamanho do fio de miçangas: Nº 11 (tamanho japonês); Nº 12 (tamanho japonês); Nº 16 (tamanho japonês); Nº 4 (tamanho japonês); Nº 8 (tamanho japonês); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fino; G; Grosso; Médio; Outros
es: Tamaño del hilo de abalorios: N.º 11 (tamaño japonés); N.º 12 (tamaño japonés); N.º 16 (tamaño japonés); N.º 4 (tamaño japonés); N.º 8 (tamaño japonés); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fino; G; Grueso; Medio; Otro
lt-LT: Karoliukų siūlo dydis: Nr. 11 (japoniškas dydis); Nr. 12 (japoniškas dydis); Nr. 16 (japoniškas dydis); Nr. 4 (japoniškas dydis); Nr. 8 (japoniškas dydis); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Plonas; G; Storas; Vidutinis; Kita
nb: Gjengestørrelse for perler: #11 (japansk størrelse); #12 (japansk størrelse); #16 (japansk størrelse); #4 (japansk størrelse); #8 (japansk størrelse); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fin; G; Grov; Medium; Annet
sl-SI: Velikost niti za bisere: #11 (japonska velikost); #12 (japonska velikost); #16 (japonska velikost); #4 (japonska velikost); #8 (japonska velikost); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Tanko; G; Debelo; Srednje; Drugo
sv: Storlek på pärltråd: #11 (japansk storlek); #12 (japansk storlek); #16 (japansk storlek); #4 (japansk storlek); #8 (japansk storlek); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fin; G; Kraftig; Medium; Övrigt
vi: Kích cỡ chỉ xỏ hạt xâu chuỗi: #11 (Kích thước Nhật Bản); #12 (Kích thước Nhật Bản); #16 (Kích thước Nhật Bản); #4 (Kích thước Nhật Bản); #8 (Kích thước Nhật Bản); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Mảnh; G; Dày; Vừa; Khác
zh-TW: 串珠線尺寸: #11 (日本尺寸); #12 (日本尺寸); #16 (日本尺寸); #4 (日本尺寸); #8 (日本尺寸); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; 細; G; 粗; 中等; 其他
it: Taglia del filo per perline: N. 11 (misura giapponese); N. 12 (misura giapponese); N. 16 (misura giapponese); N. 4 (misura giapponese); N. 8 (misura giapponese); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fine; G; Spesso; Medio; Altro
nl: Maat rijggaren: #11 (Japanse maat); #12 (Japanse maat); #16 (Japanse maat); #4 (Japanse maat); #8 (Japanse maat); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fijn; G; Zwaar; Medium; Overige
bg-BG: Размер на нишката за мъниста: #11 (японски размер); #12 (японски размер); #16 (японски размер); #4 (японски размер); #8 (японски размер); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Фин; G; Дебел; Среден; Друго
ro-RO: Dimensiunea firului pentru mărgele: #11 (dimensiune japoneză); #12 (dimensiune japoneză); #16 (dimensiune japoneză); #4 (dimensiune japoneză); #8 (dimensiune japoneză); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Subțire; G; Gros; Mediu; Altele
hr-HR: Veličina konca za perle: Br. 11 (japanska veličina); Br. 12 (japanska veličina); Br. 16 (japanska veličina); Br. 4 (japanska veličina); Br. 8 (japanska veličina); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fino; G; Debelo; Srednje; Ostalo
de: Perlenfadengröße: #11 (Japanische Größe); #12 (Japanische Größe); #16 (Japanische Größe); #4 (Japanische Größe); #8 (Japanische Größe); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fein; G; Schwer; Mittel; Sonstige
sk-SK: Rozmery korálkovej priadze: Č. 11 (japonská veľkosť); Č. 12 (japonská veľkosť); Č. 16 (japonská veľkosť); Č. 4 (japonská veľkosť); Č. 8 (japonská veľkosť); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Jemné; G; Hrubé; Stredné; Iné
ja: ビーズ糸サイズ: #11 (日本サイズ); #12 (日本サイズ); #16 (日本サイズ); #4 (日本サイズ); #8 (日本サイズ); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; ファイン; G; ヘビー; ミディアム; その他
en: Beading thread size: #11 (Japanese size); #12 (Japanese size); #16 (Japanese size); #4 (Japanese size); #8 (Japanese size); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fine; G; Heavy; Medium; Other
fr: Calibre du fil à perler: Nº 11 (taille japonaise); Nº 12 (taille japonaise); Nº 16 (taille japonaise); Nº 4 (taille japonaise); Nº 8 (taille japonaise); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Fin; G; Épais; Moyen; Autre
ru: Размер бисерной нити: №11 (японский размер); №12 (японский размер); №16 (японский размер); №4 (японский размер); №8 (японский размер); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Тонкий; G; Толстый; Средний; Другое
th: ขนาดด้ายร้อยลูกปัด: #11 (ขนาดญี่ปุ่น); #12 (ขนาดญี่ปุ่น); #16 (ขนาดญี่ปุ่น); #4 (ขนาดญี่ปุ่น); #8 (ขนาดญี่ปุ่น); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; เส้นเล็ก; G; เส้นใหญ่; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
tr: Boncuk dizme ipi ölçüsü: 11 Numara (Japon boyutu); 12 Numara (Japon boyutu); 16 Numara (Japon boyutu); 4 Numara (Japon boyutu); 8 Numara (Japon boyutu); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; İnce; G; Kalın; Orta; Diğer
el: Μέγεθος κλωστής για χάντρες: Νο. 11 (ιαπωνικό μέγεθος); Νο. 12 (ιαπωνικό μέγεθος); Νο. 16 (ιαπωνικό μέγεθος); Νο. 4 (ιαπωνικό μέγεθος); Νο. 8 (ιαπωνικό μέγεθος); 0; 00; 1; 2; 4; 6; 8; A; B; D; F; Λεπτό; G; Χοντρό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο